Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1739
Foreign support order; receipt of amendment or modification; effect.

Upon receiving a certified copy of any amendment or modification to a foreign support order entered pursuant to section 43-1729, the department shall initiate necessary procedures to amend or modify the income withholding order of this state which was based upon the foreign support order in the same manner as if it were a support order of this state.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 59.